California, session 20252026, AB2567.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11266 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:11266. (a) At the time of application, the county shall determine whether the applicant needs immediate assistance because the applicant does not have sufficient resources to meet their emergency needs, and shall determine whether the applicant is apparently eligible for aid under this chapter.(1) The county shall determine that the applicant needs immediate assistance if the family’s total available liquid resources, both nonexempt and exempt, are less than one hundred dollars ($100) and there is an emergency situation, whether foreseeable or not. Examples of emergency situations include, but are not limited to, lack of housing, lack of food, notice of termination or loss of utility service, lack of essential clothing (including diapers), and inability to meet essential transportation needs.(2) Apparent eligibility exists when evidence presented by the applicant or which is otherwise available to the county welfare department and the information provided on the application documents indicate that there would be eligibility for aid under this chapter if the evidence and information were verified. An applicant who is not a citizen or national of the United States and who does not provide verification of their eligible immigration status shall not be considered to be apparently eligible under this subdivision.(3) (A) The county shall make a determination of apparent eligibility for immediate assistance and for homeless assistance without requiring, as a prerequisite to making that determination, that the applicant apply for any unconditionally available income the applicant does not currently receive.(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “unconditionally available income” includes, but is not limited to, unemployment insurance benefits, social security benefits, veterans’ benefits, or state disability insurance benefits.(b) If an applicant needs immediate assistance, and is apparently eligible for aid as defined in subdivision (a), the county shall pay the applicant two hundred dollars ($200) or the maximum amount for which that applicant is eligible, whichever is less. The advance payment shall be made by the end of the first working day following the request for that aid. The county shall verify the applicant’s eligibility for aid within 15 working days of the date that immediate need is requested, and advance payments made under this section shall be offset against the first grant payment made to the recipient.(c) An applicant’s receipt of a notice of eviction, including a three-day notice to pay or quit, shall constitute an emergency situation under subdivision (a), irrespective of the one-hundred-dollar ($100) resource test, if the applicant has insufficient income or resources to pay the rent owing. In those cases, the county shall give the applicant the option of receiving an immediate advance on the grant as described in subdivision (b), or an expedited determination of eligibility for aid. Before an applicant decides between these two options, the county shall fully apprise the applicant, in writing, of all information necessary to establish eligibility for aid. If an applicant requests expedited determination of eligibility for aid, the county shall complete the determination of eligibility for aid under this chapter, and, if the applicant is determined to be eligible, issue payment of the full prorated grant no more than three working days from the request for immediate need. If the eligibility determination is not made within this three-day period, the county shall immediately pay the applicant two hundred dollars ($200) or the maximum amount for which the applicant is eligible, whichever is less, as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b). The county shall verify the applicant’s eligibility within 15 working days of the date of the request for immediate assistance, and advance payments made under this subdivision shall be offset against the first grant payment made to the recipient.(d) (1) The county may deny an immediate advance payment if the applicant’s only immediate need is homelessness and this need will be met by issuance of nonrecurring special needs payment in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 11450, or if the applicant’s only immediate need is lack of food and this need will be met by issuance of CalFresh benefits within one working day of the request therefor. With regard to all other immediate needs, an advance payment may be denied and the applicant referred to another public or private program or resource, if all of the following conditions are met:(A) Not more than one referral is made and the referral, when made, is to meet no more than one need.(B) The county has verified in advance that the specific need can be satisfactorily addressed by the other program or resource immediately.(C) Travel to the other program or resource will not impose a hardship on the applicant.(2) If, for any reason, the other program or resource does not satisfactorily meet the applicant’s need, the applicant shall be immediately issued an advance payment, as specified in subdivision (b).(3) Except in the case of an applicant whose only need is lack of food and the need is met with the issuance of CalFresh benefits within one working day of the request, where an applicant’s immediate need is met by an alternative program or resource authorized in this subdivision, the county shall verify the applicant’s eligibility for aid within 15 working days of the date of request.(e) A denial of an immediate need application shall not constitute a denial of the application for aid unless it is based upon the failure to meet relevant eligibility requirements.SEC. 2. No appropriation pursuant to Section 15200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be made for purposes of this act.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.